Hawaii statutes.
§11-64 Names of party officers to be filed.
All parties shall submit to the chief election officer and the respective
county clerks not later than 4:30 p.m. on the ninetieth day prior to the next
primary, a list of names and addresses of officers of the central committee and
of the respective county committees. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L 1973, c 217,
§1(r); am L 1983, c 34, §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next